Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Article 4. Nonresidents

§ 2711.
Nonresidents; powers of guardian.

When on the petition of a nonresident person, or other person interested in the welfare of that person, it appears that the person owns or has an interest in real or personal estate situated in this State, and that the person, if a resident, would be liable to be put under guardianship under any of the provisions of this chapter, the Probate Division of the Superior Court may appoint a guardian as to the property of that person within this State. As to such property, the guardian shall have the same powers, rights, and duties as a guardian appointed for a person residing within the State.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 127;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 2712.
Hearing.

When petition is made for the appointment of a guardian under section 2711 of this title, the Probate Division of the Superior Court shall proceed under the Rules of Probate Procedure as in cases of the appointment of guardians of resident mentally disabled persons.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 179, eff. March 29, 1972;

1979, No. 76

, § 6;

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 128;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.